Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,101
Judicial notice.

Every court of this state shall take judicial notice of the common law and statutes of every state, territory and other jurisdiction of the United States.

Laws 1947, c. 93, § 1, p. 272.

Where statutes of sister state have not been interpreted, the courts of this state will give a practical interpretation thereto. Exstrum v. Union Cas. & Life Ins. Co., 165 Neb. 554, 86 N.W.2d 568 (1957).

Act is applicable to any action seeking to enforce rights based upon the common law or statute law of another state. Abramson v. Abramson, 161 Neb. 782, 74 N.W.2d 919 (1956).

Provisions of this act must be properly invoked. Smith v. Brooks, 154 Neb. 93, 47 N.W.2d 389 (1951).

Uniform Judicial Notice of Foreign Law Act does not remove the necessity of pleading and presenting the common law or statutes of sister state. Scott v. Scott, 153 Neb. 906, 46 N.W.2d 627 (1951).

District court was authorized to take judicial notice of the laws of Colorado. Snyder v. Lincoln, 153 Neb. 611, 45 N.W.2d 749 (1951).

The federal court sitting in Nebraska without violating doctrine of Erie R. Co. v. Tompkins, takes judicial notice of law of another state although it was not pleaded and proved and although under Nebraska law, if law of foreign state is not pleaded and proved, it is presumed to be the same as the law of the forum. Fullington v. Iowa Sheet Metal Contractors, Inc., 319 F.Supp. 243 (D. Neb. 1970).